Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1643.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4306(b) of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 4306. Enforcement of foreign judgments.* * *(b) Filing and status of foreign judgments.--[A](1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), a copy of any foreign judgment including the docket entries incidental thereto authenticated in accordance with act of Congress or this title may be filed in the office of the clerk of any court of common pleas of this Commonwealth. The clerk shall treat the foreign judgment in the same manner as a judgment of any court of common pleas of this Commonwealth. A judgment 123456789101112131415161718 so filed shall be a lien as of the date of filing and shall have the same effect and be subject to the same procedures, defenses and proceedings for reopening, vacating, or staying as a judgment of any court of common pleas of this Commonwealth and may be enforced or satisfied in like manner.(2) A court of common pleas of this Commonwealth shall have no authority under this section to enforce or satisfy a foreign judgment upon a judgment creditor for any matter involving the provision or delivery of reproductive health care services.(3) As used in this subsection, the term "reproductive health care services" means medical, surgical, counseling or referral services relating to the human reproductive system, including services relating to pregnancy, contraception or the termination of a pregnancy, which are provided in any hospital, outpatient clinic, physician's office or other medical facility or office.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1643PN1993 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819